Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
Article 2 Regulation of Boilers and Pressure Vessels

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446 redesignated Chapter 11 of Title 34 as this article.

25-15-10.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Boiler and Pressure Vessel Safety Act” and, except as otherwise provided in this article, shall apply to all boilers and pressure vessels.

History.

Code 1981, §

34-11-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-10

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-1 as present Code Section 25-15-10, and twice substituted “article” for “chapter” in this Code section.

25-15-11.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Boiler” means a closed vessel in which water or other liquid is heated, steam or vapor is generated, or steam is superheated or in which any combination of these functions is accomplished, under pressure or vacuum, for use externally to itself, by the direct application of energy from the combustion of fuels or from electricity, solar, or nuclear energy. The term “boiler” shall include fired units for heating or vaporizing liquids other than water where these units are separate from processing systems and are complete within themselves. The term “boiler” is further defined as follows:

“Heating boiler” means a steam or vapor boiler operating at pressures not exceeding 15 psig or a hot water boiler operating at pressures not exceeding 160 psig or temperatures not exceeding 250 degrees Fahrenheit.

“High pressure, high temperature water boiler” means a water boiler operating at pressures exceeding 160 psig or temperatures exceeding 250 degrees Fahrenheit.

“Power boiler” means a boiler in which steam or other vapor is generated at a pressure of more than 15 psig.

“Certificate of inspection” means an inspection, the report of which is used by the chief inspector to determine whether or not a certificate as provided by subsection (c) of Code Section 25-15-24 may be issued.

“Commissioner” means the Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Office” means the office of Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Pressure vessel” means a vessel other than those vessels defined in paragraph (1) of this Code section in which the pressure is obtained from an external source or by the application of heat.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1349, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 11; Code 1981, §

25-15-11

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-2 as present Code Section 25-15-11; substituted “article” for “chapter” in the introductory paragraph; deleted paragraph (1), which read: “Reserved.”; redesignated former paragraphs (2) and (3) as present paragraphs (1) and (2), respectively; substituted “25-15-24” for “34-11-15” in paragraph (2); redesignated former paragraph (4) as present paragraph (3), and, in paragraph (3), substituted “Safety Fire Commissioner” for “Commissioner of Labor”; added paragraph (4); deleted former paragraph (5), which read: “ ‘Department’ means the Department of Labor.”; redesignated former paragraph (6) as present paragraph (5), and, in paragraph (5), substituted “paragraph (1)” for “paragraph (2)”.

25-15-12.
Consulting on boilers and pressure vessels.

The Commissioner shall be authorized to consult with persons knowledgeable in the areas of construction, use, or safety of boilers and pressure vessels and to create committees composed of such consultants to assist the Commissioner in carrying out his or her duties under this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 213, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 443, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 12; Code 1981, §

25-15-12

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-3 as present Code Section 25-15-12, and substituted “article” for “chapter” at the end of this Code section.

25-15-13.
Definitions, rules, and regulations for safe construction, installation, inspection, maintenance, and repair.

The office shall formulate definitions, rules, and regulations for the safe construction, installation, inspection, maintenance, and repair of boilers and pressure vessels in this state.

The definitions, rules, and regulations so formulated for new construction shall be based upon and at all times follow the generally accepted nation-wide engineering standards, formulas, and practices established and pertaining to boiler and pressure vessel construction and safety; and the office may adopt an existing published codification thereof, known as the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code of the American Society of Mechanical Engineers, with the amendments and interpretations thereto made and approved by the council of the society, and may likewise adopt the amendments and interpretations subsequently made and published by the same authority. When so adopted, the same shall be deemed to be incorporated into and shall constitute a part of the whole of the definitions, rules, and regulations of the office. Amendments and interpretations to the code so adopted shall be effective immediately upon being promulgated, to the end that the definitions, rules, and regulations shall at all times follow the generally accepted nation-wide engineering standards.

The office shall formulate the rules and regulations for the inspection, maintenance, and repair of boilers and pressure vessels which were in use in this state prior to the date upon which the first rules and regulations under this article pertaining to existing installations become effective or during the 12 month period immediately thereafter. The rules and regulations so formulated shall be based upon and at all times follow generally accepted nation-wide engineering standards and practices and may adopt sections of the Inspection Code of the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors or API 510 of the American Petroleum Institute, as applicable.

The rules and regulations and any subsequent amendments thereto formulated by the office shall, immediately following a hearing upon not less than 20 days’ notice as provided in this article, be approved and published and when so promulgated shall have the force and effect of law, except that the rules applying to the construction of new boilers and pressure vessels shall not become mandatory until 12 months after their promulgation by the office. Notice of the hearing shall give the time and place of the hearing and shall state the matters to be considered at the hearing. Such notice shall be given to all persons directly affected by such hearing. In the event all persons directly affected are unknown, notice may be perfected by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in this state at least 20 days prior to such hearing.

Subsequent amendments to the rules and regulations adopted by the office shall be permissive immediately and shall become mandatory 12 months after their promulgation.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 213, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 13; Code 1981, §

25-15-13

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-4 as present Code Section 25-15-13, and substituted “office” for “Department of Labor” throughout this Code section; and substituted “article” for “chapter” in the first sentences of paragraph (a)(3) and subsection (b).

25-15-14.
Effect on new construction and installation.

No boiler or pressure vessel which does not conform to the rules and regulations of the office governing new construction and installation shall be installed and operated in this state after 12 months from the date upon which the first rules and regulations under this article pertaining to new construction and installation shall have become effective, unless the boiler or pressure vessel is of special design or construction and is not inconsistent with the spirit and safety objectives of such rules and regulations, in which case a special installation and operating permit may at its discretion be granted by the office.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 213, § 3; Code 1981, §

25-15-14

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-5 as present Code Section 25-15-14, and, in this Code section, substituted “office” for “Department of Labor” twice, and substituted “article” for “chapter”.

25-15-15.
Maximum allowable working pressure.

The maximum allowable working pressure of a boiler carrying the ASME Code symbol or of a pressure vessel carrying the ASME or API-ASME symbol shall be determined by the applicable sections of the code under which it was constructed and stamped. Subject to the concurrence of the enforcement authority at the point of installation, such a boiler or pressure vessel may be rerated in accordance with the rules of a later edition of the ASME Code and in accordance with the rules of the National Board Inspection Code or API 510, as applicable.

The maximum allowable working pressure of a boiler or pressure vessel which does not carry the ASME or the API-ASME Code symbol shall be computed in accordance with the Inspection Code of the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors.

This article shall not be construed as in any way preventing the use, sale, or reinstallation of a boiler or pressure vessel referred to in this Code section, provided it has been made to conform to the rules and regulations of the office governing existing installations and provided, further, that it has not been found upon inspection to be in an unsafe condition.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 14; Code 1981, §

25-15-15

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-6 as present Code Section 25-15-15; and, in subsection (c), substituted “article” for “chapter” near the beginning, and substituted “office” for “department” near the middle.

25-15-16.
Exceptions.

This article shall not apply to the following boilers and pressure vessels:

Boilers and pressure vessels under federal control or under regulations of 49 C.F.R. 192 and 193;

Pressure vessels used for transportation and storage of compressed or liquefied gases when constructed in compliance with specifications of the United States Department of Transportation and when charged with gas or liquid, marked, maintained, and periodically requalified for use, as required by appropriate regulations of the United States Department of Transportation;

Pressure vessels located on vehicles operating under the rules of other state or federal authorities and used for carrying passengers or freight;

Air tanks installed on the right of way of railroads and used directly in the operation of trains;

Pressure vessels that do not exceed:

Five cubic feet in volume and 250 psig pressure; or

One and one-half cubic feet in volume and 600 psig pressure; or

An inside diameter of six inches with no limitation on pressure;

Pressure vessels having an internal or external working pressure not exceeding 15 psig with no limit on size;

Pressure vessels with a nominal water-containing capacity of 120 gallons or less for containing water under pressure, including those containing air, the compression of which serves only as a cushion;

Pressure vessels containing water heated by steam or any other indirect means when none of the following limitations are exceeded:

A heat input of 200,000 BTU per hour;

A water temperature of 210 degrees Fahrenheit; and

A nominal water-containing capacity of 120 gallons;

Hot water supply boilers which are directly fired with oil, gas, or electricity when none of the following limitations are exceeded:

Heat input of 200,000 BTU per hour;

Water temperature of 210 degrees Fahrenheit; and

Nominal water-containing capacity of 120 gallons.

These exempt hot water supply boilers shall be equipped with ASME-National Board approved safety relief valves;

Pressure vessels in the care, custody, and control of research facilities and used solely for research purposes which require one or more details of noncode construction or which involve destruction or reduced life expectancy of those vessels;

Pressure vessels or other structures or components that are not considered to be within the scope of ASME Code, Section VIII;

Boilers and pressure vessels operated and maintained for the production and generation of electricity; provided, however, that any person, firm, partnership, or corporation operating such a boiler or pressure vessel has insurance or is self-insured and such boiler or pressure vessel is regularly inspected in accordance with the minimum requirements for safety as defined in the ASME Code by an inspector who has been issued a certificate of competency by the Commissioner in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 25-15-19;

Boilers and pressure vessels operated and maintained as a part of a manufacturing process; provided, however, that any person, firm, partnership, or corporation operating such a boiler or pressure vessel has insurance or is self-insured and such boiler or pressure vessel is regularly inspected in accordance with the minimum requirements for safety as defined in the ASME Code by an inspector who has been issued a certificate of competency by the Commissioner in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 25-15-19;

Boilers and pressure vessels operated and maintained by a public utility; and

Autoclaves used only for the sterilization of reusable medical or dental implements in the place of business of any professional licensed by the laws of this state.

The following boilers and pressure vessels shall be exempt from the requirements of subsections (b), (c), and (d) of Code Section 25-15-23 and Code Sections 25-15-24 and 25-15-26:

Boilers or pressure vessels located on farms and used solely for agricultural or horticultural purposes;

Heating boilers or pressure vessels which are located in private residences or in apartment houses of less than six family units;

Any pressure vessel used as an external part of an electrical circuit breaker or transformer;

Pressure vessels on remote oil or gas-producing lease locations that have fewer than ten buildings intended for human occupancy per 0.25 square mile and where the closest building is at least 220 yards from any vessel;

Pressure vessels used for storage of liquid propane gas under the jurisdiction of the state fire marshal, except for pressure vessels used for storage of liquefied petroleum gas, 2,000 gallons or above, which have been modified or altered; and

Air storage tanks not exceeding 16 cubic feet (120 gallons) in size and under 250 psig pressure.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 213, § 4; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 34; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1349, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 34; Ga. L. 1988, p. 314, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 34; Ga. L. 1989, p. 465, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 816, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 434, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 914, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-16

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-7 as present Code Section 25-15-16; substituted “article” for “chapter” in the introductory language of subsection (a); substituted “49 C.F.R. 192 and 193” for “Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, Parts 192 and 193” in paragraph (a)(1); substituted “25-15-19” for “34-11-10” in paragraphs (a)(12) and (a)(13); and substituted “Code Section 25-15-23 and Code Sections 25-15-24 and 25-15-26” for “Code Section 34-11-14 and Code Sections 34-11-15 and 34-11-16” in the introductory language of subsection (b).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, a hyphen was inserted in “water-containing” in subparagraph (a)(8)(C) and a hyphen was inserted in “gas-producing” in paragraph (b)(4).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “liquefied” was substituted for “liquified” in paragraph (a)(2).

25-15-17.
Chief inspector.

The Commissioner may appoint to be chief inspector a citizen of this state or, if not available, a citizen of another state, who shall have had at the time of such appointment not less than five years’ experience in the construction, installation, inspection, operation, maintenance, or repair of high pressure boilers and pressure vessels as a mechanical engineer, steam operating engineer, boilermaker, or boiler inspector and who shall have passed the same kind of examination as that prescribed under Code Section 25-15-20. Such chief inspector may be removed for cause after due investigation by the Commissioner.

The chief inspector, if authorized by the Commissioner, is charged, directed, and empowered:

To take action necessary for the enforcement of the laws of this state governing the use of boilers and pressure vessels to which this article applies and of the rules and regulations of the office;

To keep a complete record of the name of each owner or user and his or her location and, except for pressure vessels covered by an owner or user inspection service, the type, dimensions, maximum allowable working pressure, age, and the last recorded inspection of all boilers and pressure vessels to which this article applies;

To publish in print or electronically and make available to anyone requesting them copies of the rules and regulations promulgated by the office;

To issue or to suspend or revoke for cause inspection certificates as provided for in Code Section 25-15-24; and

To cause the prosecution of all violators of the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 34; Ga. L. 1985, p. 213, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1349, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Code 1981, §

25-15-17

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-8 as present Code Section 25-15-17; in subsection (a), substituted “25-15-20” for “34-11-11” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted “the board and its recommendation to” following “investigation by” in the second sentence; substituted “article” for “chapter” in paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(5); substituted “office” for “department” in paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(3); substituted “this state” for “the state” near the beginning of paragraph (b)(1); in paragraph (b)(2), inserted “or her” near the middle, and substituted “this article” for “the chapter” near the end; and substituted “25-15-24” for “34-11-15” in paragraph (b)(4).

25-15-18.
Deputy inspectors.

The Commissioner may employ deputy inspectors who shall be responsible to the chief inspector and who shall have had at the time of appointment not less than three years’ experience in the construction, installation, inspection, operation, maintenance, or repair of high pressure boilers and pressure vessels as a mechanical engineer, steam operating engineer, boilermaker, or boiler inspector and who shall have passed the examination provided for in Code Section 25-15-20.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-9, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 213, § 6; Code 1981, §

25-15-18

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-9 as present Code Section 25-15-18, and substituted “25-15-20” for “34-11-11” at the end of this Code section.

25-15-19.
Special inspectors.

In addition to the deputy inspectors authorized by Code Section 25-15-18 the Commissioner shall, upon the request of any company licensed to insure and insuring in this state boilers and pressure vessels or upon the request of any company operating pressure vessels in this state for which the owner or user maintains a regularly established inspection service which is under the supervision of one or more technically competent individuals whose qualifications are satisfactory to the office and causes such pressure vessels to be regularly inspected and rated by such inspection service in accordance with applicable provisions of the rules and regulations adopted by the office pursuant to Code Section 25-15-13, issue to any inspectors of such insurance company certificates of competency as special inspectors and to any inspectors of such company operating pressure vessels certificates of competency as owner or user inspectors, provided that each such inspector before receiving or her certificate of competency shall satisfactorily pass the examination provided for by Code Section 25-15-20 or, in lieu of such examination, shall hold a commission or a certificate of competency as an inspector of boilers or pressure vessels for a state that has a standard of examination substantially equal to that of this state or a commission as an inspector of boilers and pressure vessels issued by the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors. A certificate of competency as an owner or user inspector shall be issued to an inspector of a company operating pressure vessels in this state only if, in addition to meeting the requirements stated in this Code section, the inspector is employed full time by the company and is responsible for making inspections of pressure vessels used or to be used by such company and which are not for resale.

Such special inspectors or owner or user inspectors shall receive no salary from nor shall any of their expenses be paid by the state, and the continuance of their certificates of competency shall be conditioned upon their continuing in the employ of the boiler insurance company duly authorized or in the employ of the company so operating pressure vessels in this state and upon their maintenance of the standards imposed by this article.

Such special inspectors or owner or user inspectors may inspect all boilers and pressure vessels insured or all pressure vessels operated by their respective companies; and, when so inspected, the owners and users of such boilers and pressure vessels shall be exempt from the payment to the state of the inspection fees as prescribed in rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-10, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1349, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 34; Code 1981, §

25-15-19

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-10 as present Code Section 25-15-19; in subsection (a), substituted “such” for “said” throughout, near the beginning, substituted “Code Section 25-15-18” for “Code Section 34-11-9”,
and, near the middle, twice substituted “office” for “department”, substituted “Code Section 25-15-13” for “Code Section 34-11-4”, inserted “or her”, and substituted “Code Section 25-15-20” for “Code Section 34-11-11”; and, in subsection (b), deleted “as aforesaid” following “duly authorized”, and substituted “article” for “chapter” at the end.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “full time” was substituted for “fulltime” in the last sentence of subsection (a).

25-15-20.
Examination of inspectors.

The examination for chief, deputy, special, or owner or user inspectors shall be in writing and shall be held by the office or by an examining board appointed in accordance with the requirements of the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors, with at least two members present at all times during the examination. Such examination shall be confined to questions the answers to which will aid in determining the fitness and competency of the applicant for the intended service and may be those prepared by the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors. In case an applicant fails to pass the examination, he or she may appeal to the office for another examination which shall be given by the office or the appointed examining board after 90 days. The record of an applicant’s examination shall be accessible to the applicant and his or her employer.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-11, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-20

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-11 as present Code Section 25-15-20, and, in this Code section, substituted “office” for “board” in the first and third sentences, in the third sentence, inserted “or she”, and substituted “office or the appointed examining board” for “board”, and, in the fourth sentence, substituted “the applicant” for “said applicant” and inserted “or her”.

25-15-21.
Suspension and revocation of inspector’s certificate of competency; hearing; reinstatement.

An inspector’s certificate of competency may be suspended by the Commissioner after due investigation for the incompetence or untrustworthiness of the holder thereof or for willful falsification of any matter or statement contained in his or her application or in a report of any inspection made by him or her. Written notice of any such suspension shall be given by the Commissioner within not more than ten days thereof to the inspector and his or her employer. A person whose certificate of competency has been suspended shall be entitled to an appeal as provided in Code Section 25-15-28 and to be present in person and to be represented by counsel at the hearing of the appeal.

If the office has reason to believe that an inspector is no longer qualified to hold his or her certificate of competency, the office shall provide written notice to the inspector and his or her employer of the office’s determination and the right to an appeal as provided in Code Section 25-15-28. If, as a result of such hearing, the inspector has been determined to be no longer qualified to hold his or her certificate of competency, the Commissioner shall thereupon revoke such certificate of competency forthwith.

A person whose certificate of competency has been suspended shall be entitled to apply, after 90 days from the date of such suspension, for reinstatement of such certificate of competency.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-12, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 15; Code 1981, §

25-15-21

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-12 as present Code Section 25-15-21; substituted “25-15-28” for “34-11-19” in the last sentence of subsection (a) and in the first sentence of subsection (b); deleted “and recommendation by the office” following “due investigation” in the first sentence of subsection (a); and, in subsection (b), twice substituted “office” for “department”, and substituted “office’s” for “department”.

25-15-22.
Replacement of lost or destroyed certificates of competency.

If a certificate of competency is lost or destroyed, a new certificate of competency shall be issued in its place without another examination.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-13, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-22

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-13 as present Code Section 25-15-22.

25-15-23.
Inspections.

The Commissioner, the chief inspector, or any deputy inspector shall have free access, during reasonable hours, to any premises in this state where a boiler or pressure vessel is being constructed for use in, or is being installed in, this state for the purpose of ascertaining whether such boiler or pressure vessel is being constructed and installed in accordance with the provisions of this article.

On and after January 1, 1986, each boiler and pressure vessel used or proposed to be used within this state, except for pressure vessels covered by an owner or user inspection service as described in subsection (d) of this Code section or except for boilers or pressure vessels exempt under Code Section 25-15-16 (owners and users may request to waive this exemption), shall be thoroughly inspected as to their construction, installation, and condition as follows:

Power boilers and high pressure, high temperature water boilers shall receive a certificate inspection annually which shall be an internal inspection where construction permits; otherwise, it shall be as complete an inspection as possible. Such boilers shall also be externally inspected while under pressure, if possible;

Low pressure steam or vapor heating boilers shall receive a certificate inspection biennially with an internal inspection every four years where construction permits;

Hot water heating and hot water supply boilers shall receive a certificate inspection biennially with an internal inspection at the discretion of the inspector;

Pressure vessels subject to internal corrosion shall receive a certificate inspection triennially with an internal inspection at the discretion of the inspector. Pressure vessels not subject to internal corrosion shall receive a certificate of inspection at intervals set by the office; and

Nuclear vessels within the scope of this article shall be inspected and reported in such form and with such appropriate information as the office shall designate.

A grace period of two months beyond the periods specified in subparagraphs (A) through (D) of this paragraph may elapse between certificate inspections.

The office may provide for longer periods between certificate inspection in its rules and regulations.

Under the provisions of this article, the office is responsible for providing for the safety of life, limb, and property and therefore has jurisdiction over the interpretation and application of the inspection requirements as provided for in the rules and regulations which it has promulgated. The person conducting the inspection during construction and installation shall certify as to the minimum requirements for safety as defined in the ASME Code. Inspection requirements of operating equipment shall be in accordance with generally accepted practice and compatible with the actual service conditions, such as:

Previous experience, based on records of inspection, performance, and maintenance;

Location, with respect to personnel hazard;

Quality of inspection and operating personnel;

Provision for related safe operation controls; and

Interrelation with other operations outside the scope of this article.

Based upon documentation of such actual service conditions by the owner or user of the operating equipment, the office may, in its discretion, permit variations in the inspection requirements.

The inspections required in this article shall be made by the chief inspector, by a deputy inspector, by a special inspector, or by an owner or user inspector provided for in this article.

Owner or user inspection of pressure vessels is permitted, provided the owner or user inspection service is regularly established and is under the supervision of one or more individuals whose qualifications are satisfactory to the office and said owner or user causes the pressure vessels to be inspected in conformance with the National Board Inspection Code or API 510, as applicable.

If, at the discretion of the inspector, a hydrostatic test shall be deemed necessary, it shall be made by the owner or user of the boiler or pressure vessel.

All boilers, other than cast iron sectional boilers, and pressure vessels to be installed in this state after the 12 month period from the date upon which the rules and regulations of the office shall become effective shall be inspected during construction as required by the applicable rules and regulations of the office by an inspector authorized to inspect boilers and pressure vessels in this state or, if constructed outside of the state, by an inspector holding a commission issued by the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-14, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 213, § 7; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1349, § 5; Code 1981, §

25-15-23

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-14 as present Code Section 25-15-23; substituted “office” for “board” and substituted “article” for “chapter” throughout this Code section; substituted “this state” for “the state” near the middle of subsection (a); substituted “25-15-16” for “34-11-7” in paragraph (b)(1); added a comma following “otherwise” in subparagraph (b)(1)(A); substituted “office” for “department” in paragraph (b)(3); and substituted “this article, the office” for “this chapter, the department” in paragraph (b)(4).

25-15-24.
Filing and maintenance of special investigator’s report; issuance and suspension of inspection certificate.

Each company employing special inspectors shall, within 30 days following each certificate inspection made by such inspectors, file a report of such inspection with the chief inspector upon appropriate forms as promulgated by the Commissioner. The filing of reports of external inspections, other than certificate inspections, shall not be required except when such inspections disclose that the boiler or pressure vessel is in a dangerous condition.

Each company operating pressure vessels covered by an owner or user inspection service meeting the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 25-15-19 shall maintain in its files an inspection record which shall list, by number and such abbreviated description as may be necessary for identification, each pressure vessel covered by this article, the date of the last inspection of each pressure vessel, and the approximate date for the next inspection. The inspection record shall be available for examination by the chief inspector or the chief inspector’s authorized representative during business hours.

If the report filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shows that a boiler or pressure vessel is found to comply with the rules and regulations of the office, the chief inspector, or his or her duly authorized representative, shall issue to such owner or user an inspection certificate bearing the date of inspection and specifying the maximum pressure under which the boiler or pressure vessel may be operated. Such inspection certificate shall be valid for not more than 14 months from its date in the case of power boilers, 26 months in the case of heating and hot water supply boilers, and 38 months in the case of pressure vessels. In the case of those boilers and pressure vessels covered by subparagraphs (b)(1)(A) through (b)(1)(D) of Code Section 25-15-23 for which the office has established or extended the operating period between required inspections pursuant to the provisions of paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-15-23, the certificate shall be valid for a period of not more than two months beyond the period set by the office. Certificates for boilers shall be posted under glass, or similarly protected, in the room containing the boiler. Pressure vessel certificates shall be posted in like manner, if convenient, or filed where they will be readily accessible for examination.

No inspection certificate issued for an insured boiler or pressure vessel based upon a report of a special inspector shall be valid after the boiler or pressure vessel for which it was issued shall cease to be insured by a company duly authorized by this state to provide such insurance.

The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative may at any time suspend an inspection certificate after showing cause that the boiler or pressure vessel for which it was issued cannot be operated without menace to the public safety or when the boiler or pressure vessel is found not to comply with the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article. Each suspension of an inspection certificate shall continue in effect until such boiler or pressure vessel shall have been made to conform to the rules and regulations of the office and until such inspection certificate shall have been reinstated.

The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative may issue a written order for the temporary cessation of operation of a boiler or pressure vessel if it has been determined after inspection to be hazardous or unsafe. Operations shall not resume until such conditions are corrected to the satisfaction of the Commissioner or his or her authorized representative.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-11-15, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1349, §§ 6-8; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 34; Ga. L. 1991, p. 258, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 16; Code 1981, §

25-15-24

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 2/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-11-15 as present Code Section 25-15-24; substituted “office” for “department” throughout this Code section; substituted “article” for “chapter” in subsections (b) and (e); in subsection (b), substituted “25-15-19” for “34-11-10” in the first sentence, and substituted “the chief inspector’s” for “his” in the last sentence; in subsection (c), inserted the reference “(b)(1)” preceding “(D)”, and twice substituted “25-15-23” for “34-11-14”; substituted “the Commissioner’s” for “his” in the first sentence of subsections (e) and (f); substituted “such inspection” for “said inspection” in the second sentence of subsection (e); and inserted “or her” near the end of subsection (f).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “certificate” was substituted for “certificates” near the beginning of subsection (d).